Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.300

Suspension or revocation of certificate to operate—Grounds.

If the director finds that any alien bank to which he or she has issued a certificate to operate an office or bureau in this state pursuant to this chapter has violated any law or rule, or has conducted its affairs in an unauthorized manner, or has been unresponsive to the director's lawful orders or directions, or is in an unsound or unsafe condition, or cannot with safety and expediency continue business, or if he or she finds that the alien bank's country is unjustifiably refusing to allow banks qualified to do business in and having their principal office within this state to operate offices or similar operations in such country, the director may suspend or revoke the certificate of such alien bank and notify it of such suspension or revocation.

[ 1994 c 92 s 100; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 30. Formerly RCW 30.42.300.]